Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6186YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2159 Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . w. Kava, meaning any parts of the plant 3 piper methysticum, whether growing or not, as well as synthetic 4 equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, and 5 any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 6 preparation of that plant. Other names: Ava, intoxicating 7 pepper, kawa kawa, kew, sakau, tonga, yangona. 8